Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 3

Utility Location

13-24-301. Telephone and telegraph services — Exclusion from local regulation.

No municipal, county or regional planning commission or any municipal or county legislative body shall, by ordinance or otherwise, exclude the location or relocation of any facility used to provide telephone or telegraph services to the public.

Acts 1980, ch. 749, § 1.

Cross-References. County regulation of property, title 5, ch. 7.

Municipal codes and ordinances, title 6, ch. 54, part 5.

Municipal planning, title 13, ch. 4 parts 1-3.

Public service commission, regulation of utilities, title 65, ch. 4.

Regional planning, title 13, ch. 3, parts 1-4.

Telephones and telegraphs, title 65, ch. 21.

Utility districts, title 7, ch. 82, parts 1-6.

Zoning, title 13, ch. 7, parts 1-4.

13-24-302. Facilities included.

Such facilities include those essential to the provision of telephone and telegraph services such as central office exchanges and microwave towers which require a specific location in order to provide the most efficient service to the public.

Acts 1980, ch. 749, § 1.

13-24-303. Regulations allowed.

The exclusion of location from local regulation does not preclude the exercise of reasonable municipal and county police powers including, but not limited to, permit requirements, landscaping, off-street parking or set-back lines as an exercise of police powers.

Acts 1980, ch. 749, § 1.

13-24-304. Planning for and regulating the siting of wireless telecommunications support structures.

A municipal, county or regional planning commission or any municipal or county legislative body, referred to as an authority in this section and § 13-24-305, that has adopted planning and zoning regulations, may plan for and regulate the siting of wireless telecommunications support structures in accordance with locally adopted planning or zoning regulations and this chapter.

Acts 2005, ch. 373, § 1.

13-24-305. Limits on regulation of wireless telecommunications support structures.

In regulating the placement of a wireless telecommunications support structure, an authority may not:

Regulate the placement of an antenna or related equipment for an existing wireless telecommunications support structure; provided, however, that, if the placement of an antenna on an existing wireless telecommunications support structure requires an extension, such placement may be regulated, if such extension would require the wireless telecommunications support structure to have lighting or if such extension exceeds the height limitation of the authority. If a co-location occurs, such co-location may not be considered an expansion, and the appropriate authority may not impose additional costs or operating restrictions on the applicant for such co-location, unless such support structure is owned by the authority;

Require the applicant to provide any sort of justification for radio frequency need; or

Act to prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the provision of personal wireless services.

Acts 2005, ch. 373, § 1.